apertium-ckb.ckb.dix
    <pardef n="لەیلا__np">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکەی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ییەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکانی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

      <e lm="دانا"><i>دانا</i><par n="لەیلا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="مستەفا"><i>مستەفا</i><par n="لەیلا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="لەیلا"><i>لەیلا</i><par n="لەیلا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەنگێلا"><i>ئەنگێلا</i><par n="لەیلا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="فرانسوا"><i>فرانسوا</i><par n="لەیلا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕەزا"><i>ڕەزا</i><par n="لەیلا__np"/></e>
      <e lm="عیسا"><i>عیسا</i><par n="لەیلا__np"/></e>
